Nevada, session 83, AB195.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 386.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.165 1. In each county school district in which more than
75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees shall establish seven
election districts for school trustees. The districts must be:
(a) As nearly equal in population as practicable; and
(b) Composed of contiguous territory.
2. The board of trustees in each county school district in which
more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled is composed of 11 members, of
whom:
(a) Seven [voting] members must be elected in election districts
established pursuant to subsection 1 by the board of trustees.
(b) One [nonvoting] member must be appointed by the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the school district is
located. The member appointed pursuant to this paragraph must
reside in the county in which the school district is located.
(c) Three [nonvoting] members must be appointed by the
governing bodies of the three most populous incorporated cities in
the county in which the school district is located, with each
governing body appointing one member. Each member appointed
pursuant to this paragraph must reside in the city in which the
governing body is required to make the appointment.
3. In each county school district in which more than 25,000
pupils but not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of
trustees shall establish seven election districts for school trustees, as
follows:
(a) Five districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-fifth of the
population of the county; and
-
*AB195*

– 3 –
(b) Two districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-half of the
population of the county.
 The districts must be composed of contiguous territory.
4. Each elected trustee of a school district to which this section
applies must reside in the election district which the trustee
represents and be elected by the voters of that election district.
5. In each school district in which more than 25,000 pupils but
not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees is
composed of seven members who must be elected in an election
district established pursuant to subsection 3 by the board of trustees.
6. The appointing authority shall make an appointment
pursuant to subsection 2 at least 30 days but not more than 90 days
before the expiration of the term of office of the incumbent member.
7. The term of office of a school trustee is 4 years,
commencing on the first Monday of January thereafter next
following the election or appointment of the trustee.
8. Each trustee shall hold office until his or her successor is
appointed or elected and qualified.
9. The [nonvoting] members of the board of trustees appointed
pursuant to subsection 2 [:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b),] shall have
the same duties, rights and responsibilities as [voting] elected
members of the board of trustees, including, without limitation [,
being] :
(a) Being involved in any briefings, interviews, evaluations,
closed-door sessions and policy and operational discussions; [and]
(b) [Do not have voting rights for the election of officers or the
authority to serve as an officer of] Voting on matters before the
board of trustees [.] , including, without limitation, the election of
officers;
(c) Making or seconding motions before the board of trustees;
(d) Serving as an officer of the board of trustees; and
(e) Requesting that an item be added to an agenda or
appealing a denial of such a request.
10. The board of trustees of a school district may not adopt
any policy, bylaw or practice or take any other action to restrict or
curtail the duties, rights or responsibilities of a member of the
board of trustees based on whether the member was elected or
appointed to the office of trustee.
Sec. 2. NRS 386.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.240 1. A candidate for election to the office of trustee of
a school district shall:
[1.] (a) Be a qualified elector.
-
*AB195*

– 4 –
[2.] (b) Have the qualifications of residence within the county
school district required for the office for which he or she seeks
election.
2. No person, elected or appointed, may serve as a trustee for
any school district or combination of school districts in this State
for more than 12 years. Accordingly, no person may be elected or
appointed to the office of trustee of a school district if the person:
(a) Has served as a trustee, or at the expiration of his or her
current term if he or she is so serving will have served, 12 years or
more, for any school district or combination of school districts in
this State; or
(b) If elected or appointed, cannot serve the entire term of
office without serving more than 12 years for any school district or
combination of school districts in this State.
Sec. 3. NRS 386.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.270 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 386.275:
1. Any vacancy occurring among the elected members of a
board of trustees must be filled by appointment by the remaining
[elected] members of the board at a public meeting held after notice
of the meeting is published at least once each week for 2 weeks in a
newspaper qualified pursuant to the provisions of chapter 238 of
NRS. The appointee shall serve until the next general election, at
which time his or her successor must be elected for the balance of
the unexpired term.
2. Any vacancy occurring among the appointed members of a
board of trustees must be filled by the appointing authority. The
appointee serves for the balance of the unexpired term and , except
as otherwise provided in NRS 386.240, may be reappointed.
3. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy must have the
qualifications provided in NRS 386.165 or 386.240, as applicable.
Sec. 4. NRS 386.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.310 1. The board of trustees shall meet and organize by:
(a) Electing one of its [elected] members as president.
(b) Electing one of its [elected] members as clerk, or by
selecting some other qualified person as clerk.
(c) Electing additional officers from its [elected] members as
may be deemed necessary.
(d) Fixing the term of office for each of its officers.
2. A record of the organization of the board of trustees must be
entered in the minutes, together with the amount of salary to be paid
to the clerk.
3. Immediately after the organization of the board of trustees,
the clerk shall file the names of the president, the clerk and the
members of the board of trustees with the Department and the
-
*AB195*

– 5 –
county auditor of the county whose boundaries are conterminous
with the boundaries of the county school district.
Sec. 5. NRS 386.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.330 1. The board of trustees shall hold a regular meeting
at least once each month, at such time and place as the board shall
determine.
2. Special meetings of the board of trustees shall be held at the
call of the president whenever there is sufficient business to come
before the board, or upon the written request of three members of
the board.
3. The clerk of the board of trustees shall give written notice of
each special meeting to each member of the board of trustees by
personal delivery of the notice of the special meeting to each trustee
at least 1 day before the meeting, or by mailing the notice to each
trustee’s residence of record, by deposit in the United States mails,
postage prepaid, at least 4 days before the meeting. The notice shall
specify the time, place and purpose of the meeting. If all of the
members of the board of trustees are present at a special meeting,
the lack of notice shall not invalidate the proceedings of the board of
trustees.
4. A majority of the [elected] members of the board of trustees
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and no
action of the board of trustees shall be valid unless such action shall
receive, at a regularly called meeting, the approval of a majority of
all the [elected] members of the board of trustees.
5. The election of officers, the appointment of members to fill
a vacancy pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 386.270, the adoption
or amendment of any policies governing the operation of the
board of trustees and all other business relating to members and
their duties may be conducted during a regular or special meeting
of the board of trustees, except that such business must not be
conducted during a meeting that has been designated as a work
session or workshop.
6. In any county whose population is 55,000 or more, the board
of trustees may cause each meeting of the board to be broadcast on a
television station created to provide community access to cable
television by using the facilities of the school district, county or any
city located in the county. The board of trustees and the county or
city shall cooperate fully with each other to determine:
(a) The feasibility of televising the meetings of the board of
trustees;
(b) The costs to televise the meetings of the board of trustees for
each proposed method of televising; and
(c) The number of potential viewers of the meetings of the board
of trustees for each proposed method of televising.
-
*AB195*

– 6 –
[6.] 7. Except in an emergency that impacts the school district,
the board of trustees shall not take any action or corrective action at
a regular meeting or special meeting on an item that has been posted
on its agenda pursuant to chapter 241 of NRS after 11:59 p.m. on
the day of the meeting. If the board of trustees has not taken action
or corrective action, as applicable, on any item that is on its agenda
before 11:59 p.m. on the day of the meeting, the board of trustees
must not take any further action or corrective action on any item that
is on the meeting agenda unless the board of trustees:
(a) Schedules the delayed agenda item at a future meeting by
placing the item on its agenda for the future meeting pursuant to
chapter 241 of NRS; or
(b) Waits until at least 24 hours after the originally scheduled
time of the meeting but not later than 3 business days after the
originally scheduled date of the meeting to take action or corrective
action.
[7.] 8. As used in this section, “emergency” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 241.020.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB195*